Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 51.32.060 and 2025 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For claims with a date of injury or disease manifestation on or after July 1, 2026, when the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine that permanent total disability results from the injury, the worker shall receive monthly during the period of such disability, except as provided in RCW 51.32.010((, a)):(a) 100 percent of the employer's payment or contribution for health care benefits, unless the employer continues ongoing and current payment or contributions for these benefits at the same level as provided at the time of injury; and(b) A percentage of the worker's wages, excluding the worker's employer's payment or contribution for health care benefits, as follows:Â Worker's statusPercentage of theworker's wagesÂ Unmarried with no children60 percentÂ Unmarried with one child or married with no children65 percentÂ Unmarried with two children or married with one child67 percentÂ Unmarried with three children or married with two children69 percentÂ Unmarried with four children or married with three children71 percentÂ Unmarried with five children or married with four children73 percentÂ Unmarried with six or more children or married with five or more children75 percent(2) For claims with a date of injury or disease manifestation before July 1, 2026, when the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine that permanent total disability results from the injury, the worker shall receive monthly during the period of such disability:(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or her wages.(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven percent of his or her wages.(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine percent of his or her wages.(d) If married with three children at the time of injury, seventy-one percent of his or her wages.(e) If married with four children at the time of injury, seventy-three percent of his or her wages.(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury, seventy-five percent of his or her wages.(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or her wages.(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two percent of his or her wages.(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury, sixty-four percent of his or her wages.(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury, sixty-six percent of his or her wages.(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury, sixty-eight percent of his or her wages.(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury, seventy percent of his or her wages.(3) For any period of time where both spouses are entitled to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim their child or children for compensation purposes.(4) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.(5) Should any further accident result in the permanent total disability of an injured worker, the injured worker shall receive the pension to which the injured worker would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a lump sum for the injured worker's prior injury.(6) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this section:(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:Â AFTERPERCENTAGEÂ Â June 30, 1993105%Â Â June 30, 1994110%Â Â June 30, 1995115%Â Â June 30, 1996120%Â (b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1, 2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars per month if a worker is married and an additional ten dollars per month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children for claims with a date of injury or disease manifestation before July 1, 2026, and six children for claims with a date of injury or disease manifestation on or after July 1, 2026. However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (6)(b) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the payments provided for in subsection (4) of this section.(7) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.(8) The benefits provided by this section are subject to modification under RCW 51.32.067.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act applies to claims with a date of injury or disease manifestation on or after July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---